test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-МН_Ж_А-ножницы_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - ножницы M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      ножницы+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Nom: ножницы
      ножницы+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Acc: ножницы
      ножницы+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen: ножниц
      ножницы+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Loc: ножницах
      ножницы+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Dat: ножницам
      ножницы+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Ins: ножницами
